Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.060

Results after close of voting.

After the close of voting at 8:00 p.m., the county auditor must directly load the results from any direct recording electronic memory pack into the central accumulator.

[ 2013 c 11 s 60; 2011 c 10 s 49; 2003 c 111 s 1506. Prior: 1999 c 158 s 12. Formerly RCW 29.54.097.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.